North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 4. Relevancy and Its Limits.

Rule 401.
Definition of “relevant evidence.”

“Relevant evidence” means evidence having any tendency to make the existence of any fact that is of consequence to the determination of the action more probable or less probable than it would be without the evidence.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 401. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Problems of relevancy call for an answer to the question whether an item of evidence, when tested by the processes of legal reasoning, possesses sufficient probative value to justify receiving it in evidence. Thus, assessment of the probative value of evidence that a person purchased a revolver shortly prior to a fatal shooting with which he is charged is a matter of analysis and reasoning.

The variety of relevancy problems is coextensive with the ingenuity of counsel in using circumstantial evidence as a means of proof. An enormous number of cases fall in no set pattern, and this rule is designed as a guide for handling them. On the other hand, some situations recur with sufficient frequency to create patterns susceptible of treatment by specific rules. Rule 404 and those following it are of that variety; they also serve as illustrations of the application of the present rule as limited by the exclusionary principles of Rule 403.

Passing mention should be made of so-called ‘conditional’ relevancy. Morgan, Basic Problems of Evidence 45-46 (1962). In this situation, probative value depends not only upon satisfying the basic requirement of relevancy as described above but also upon the existence of some matter of fact. For example, if evidence of a spoken statement is relied upon to prove notice, probative value is lacking unless the person sought to be charged heard the statement. The problem is one of fact, and the only rules needed are for the purpose of determining the respective functions of judge and jury. See Rules 104(b) and 901. The discussion which follows in the present note is concerned with relevancy generally, not with any particular problem of conditional relevancy.

Relevancy is not an inherent characteristic of any item of evidence but exists only as a relation between an item of evidence and a matter properly provable in the case. Does the item of evidence tend to prove the matter sought to be proved? Whether the relationship exists depends upon principles evolved by experience or science, applies logically to the situation at hand. James, Relevancy, Probability and the Law, 29 Calif.L.Rev. 689, 696, n. 15 (1941), in Selected Writings on Evidence and Trial 610, 615, n. 15 (Fryer ed. 1957). The rule summarizes this relationship as a ‘tendency to make the existence’ of the fact to be proved ‘more probable or less probable.’ Compare Uniform Rule 1(2) which states the crux of relevancy as ‘a tendency in reason,’ thus perhaps emphasizing unduly the logical process and ignoring the need to draw upon experience or science to validate the general principle upon which relevancy in a particular situation depends.

The standard of probability under the rule is ‘more . . . probable than it would be without the evidence.’ Any more stringent requirement is unworkable and unrealistic. As McCormick § 152, p. 317, says, ‘A brick is not a wall,’ or, as Falknor, Extrinsic Policies Affecting Admissibility, 10 Rutgers L. Rev. 574, 576 (1956), quotes Professor McBaine, ‘. . . [I]t is not to be supposed that every witness can make a home run.’ Dealing with probability in the language of the rule has the added virtue of avoiding confusion between questions of admissibility and questions of the sufficiency of the evidence.

The rule uses the phrase ‘fact that is of consequence to the determination of the action’ to describe the kind of fact to which proof may properly be directed. The language is that of California Evidence Code § 210; it has the advantage of avoiding the loosely used and ambiguous word ‘material’. * * * The fact to be proved may be ultimate, intermediate, or evidentiary; it matters not, so long as it is of consequence in the determination of the action. Cf. Uniform Rule 1(2) which requires that the evidence relate to a ‘material’ fact.

The fact to which the evidence is directed need not be in dispute. While situations will arise which call for the exclusion of evidence offered to prove a point conceded by the opponent, the ruling should be made on the basis of such considerations as waste of time and undue prejudice (see Rule 403), rather than under any general requirement that evidence is admissible only if directed to matters in dispute. Evidence which is essentially background in nature can scarcely be said to involve disputed matter, yet it is universally offered and admitted as an aid to understanding. Charts, photographs, views of real estate, murder weapons, and many other items of evidence fall in this category. A rule limiting admissibility to evidence directed to a controversial point would invite the exclusion of this helpful evidence, or at least the raising of endless questions over its admission.”

While North Carolina courts have used slightly different definitions of relevant evidence, the rule is unlikely to alter significantly North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 78 (1982). Although the rule speaks in terms of relevancy, the definition includes what is often referred to in our courts as materiality.

Id.

§ 77.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Use of Rape Trauma Syndrome as Evidence in a Rape Trial: Valid or Invalid?,” see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 93 (1985).

For note, “State v. Stafford: Rape Trauma Syndrome and the Admissibility of Statements Made by Rape Victims,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1364 (1986).

For comment, “Admissibility of DNA Evidence: Perfecting the ‘Search for Truth’ ,” see 25 Wake Forest L. Rev. 591 (1990).

For note, “Evidence — Rape Shield Statute —
Witnesses — State v. Guthrie, 110 N.C. App. 91, 428 S.E.2d 853 (1993),” see
72 N.C.L. Rev. 1777 (1994).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For article, “The Admissibility of Expert Testimony in North Carolina After Howerton: Reconciling the Ruling with the Rules of Evidence,” see 28 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (2005).

For casenote, “Howerton v. Arai Helmet, Ltd.: Last Dance with the Daubert-Kumho Decisions: One Step Forward from Two Steps Back,” see
28 N.C. Cent. L.J. 109 (2005).

Rule 402.
Relevant evidence generally admissible; irrelevant evidence inadmissible.

All relevant evidence is admissible, except as otherwise provided by the Constitution of the United States, by the Constitution of North Carolina, by Act of Congress, by Act of the General Assembly or by these rules. Evidence which is not relevant is not admissible.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 402 except that the phrases “by the Constitution of North Carolina” and “by Act of the General Assembly” were added and the phrase “by other rules prescribed by the Supreme Court pursuant to statutory authority” was deleted. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The provisions that all relevant evidence is admissible, with certain exceptions, and that evidence which is not relevant is not admissible are ‘a presupposition involved in the very conception of a rational system of evidence.’ Thayer, Preliminary Treatise on Evidence 264 (1898). They constitute the foundation upon which the structure of admission and exclusion rests. * * *

Not all relevant evidence is admissible. The exclusion of relevant evidence occurs in a variety of situations and may be called for by these rules, by the Rules of Civil . . . Procedure . . ., by Act of Congress, or by constitutional considerations.

Succeeding rules in the present article, in response to the demands of particular policies, require the exclusion of evidence despite its relevancy. In addition, . . . Article VI imposes limitations upon witnesses and the manner of dealing with them; Article VII specifies requirements with respect to opinions and expert testimony; Article VIII excludes hearsay not falling within an exception; Article IX spells out the handling of authentication and identification; and Article X restricts the manner of proving the contents of writings and recordings.

* * * * *

The Rules of Civil . . . Procedure in some instances require the exclusion of relevant evidence. For example, . . . the Rules of Civil Procedure, by imposing requirements of notice and unavailability of the deponent, place limits on the use of relevant depositions.

The rule recognizes but makes no attempt to spell out the constitutional considerations which impose basic limitations upon the admissibility of relevant evidence. Examples are evidence obtained by unlawful search and seizure, Weeks v. United States, 232 U.S. 383, 34 S. Ct. 341, 58 L. Ed. 652 (1914); Katz v. United States, 389 U.S. 347, 88 S. Ct. 507, 19 L. Ed. 2d. 576 (1967); incriminating statement elicited from an accused in violation of right to counsel, Massiah v. United States, 377 U.S. 201, 84 S. Ct. 1199, 12 L. Ed. 2d. 246 (1964).”

Rule 402 is consistent with North Carolina practice.

Legal Periodicals.

For a note on the admissibility of a criminal defendant’s hypnotically refreshed testimony, see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 311 (1988).

For comment, “Admissibility of DNA Evidence: Perfecting the ‘Search for Truth’ ,” see 25 Wake Forest L. Rev. 591 (1990).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For article, “A Plea to North Carolina: Bring Fairness to the Assessment of Civil Battery Liability for Defendants with Cognitive Disabilities,” see 39 Campbell L. Rev. 241 (2017).

For comment, “Have Your Cake and Eat it Too: Cognitive Neurology and Negligence Law in North Carolina,” see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 181 (2019).

For article, “The Emotional Woman,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 1027 (2021).

Rule 403.
Exclusion of relevant evidence on grounds of prejudice, confusion, or waste of time.

Although relevant, evidence may be excluded if its probative value is substantially outweighed by the danger of unfair prejudice, confusion of the issues, or misleading the jury, or by considerations of undue delay, waste of time, or needless presentation of cumulative evidence.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 403. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The case law recognizes that certain circumstances call for the exclusion of evidence which is of unquestioned relevance. These circumstances entail risks which range all the way from inducing decision on a purely emotional basis, at one extreme, to nothing more harmful than merely wasting time, at the other extreme. Situations in this area call for balancing the probative value of and need for the evidence against the harm likely to result from its admission. * * * The rules which follow in this Article are concrete applications evolved for particular situations. However, they reflect the policies underlying the present rule, which is designed as a guide for the handling of situations for which no specific rules have been formulated.

Exclusion for risk of unfair prejudice, confusion of issues, misleading the jury, or waste of time, all find ample support in the authorities. ‘Unfair prejudice’ within its context means an undue tendency to suggest decision on an improper basis, commonly, though not necessarily, as an emotional one.

The rule does not enumerate surprise as a ground for exclusion, in this respect following Wigmore’s view of the common law. 6 Wigmore § 1849. Cf. McCormick G.S. 152, p. 320, n. 29, listing unfair surprise as a ground for exclusion but stating that it is usually ‘coupled with the danger of prejudice and confusion of issues’. * * * While it can scarcely be doubted that claims of unfair surprise may still be justified despite procedural requirements of notice and instrumentalities of discovery, the granting of a continuance is a more appropriate remedy than exclusion of the evidence. * * * Moreover, the impact of a rule excluding evidence on the ground of surprise would be difficult to estimate.”

The rule is substantially in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 77

et seq.

(1982). In North Carolina, unfair surprise appears to be a ground for exclusion of evidence.

Id.

§ 77, p. 287. However, as the Advisory Committee states, the rule does not enumerate surprise as a ground for exclusion. Nonetheless, surprise may be covered by unfair prejudice, confusion of issues, or undue delay. See Wright and Graham,

Federal Practice and Procedure: Evidence

§ 5218, at 298.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states that:

“In reaching a decision whether to exclude on grounds of unfair prejudice, consideration should be given to the probable effectiveness or lack of effectiveness of a limiting instruction. See Rule 106 and Advisory Committee’s Note thereunder. The availability of other means of proof may also be an appropriate factor.”

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the future of character impeachment in North Carolina, in light of State v. Jean,

310 N.C. 157

, 311 S.E.2d 266 (1984), see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 535 (1985).

For comment, “The Use of Rape Trauma Syndrome as Evidence in a Rape Trial: Valid or Invalid?,” see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 93 (1985).

For note, “State v. Stafford: Rape Trauma Syndrome and the Admissibility of Statements Made by Rape Victims,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1364 (1986).

For comment, “Admissibility of DNA Evidence: Perfecting the ‘Search for Truth’ ,” see 25 Wake Forest L. Rev. 591 (1990).

For note, “Evidence — Rape Shield Statute —
Witnesses — State v. Guthrie, 110 N.C. App. 91, 428 S.E.2d 853 (1993),” see
72 N.C.L. Rev. 1777 (1994).

For note, “The Admissibility of Prior Acquittal Evidence — Has North Carolina Adopted the ‘Minority View’? — The Effect of State v. Scott,” see 16 Campbell L. Rev. 231 (1994).

For article, “A Six Step Analysis of ‘Other Purposes’ Evidence Pursuant to Rule 404(b) of the North Carolina Rules of Evidence,” see 21 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1995).

For article, “DNA Profiling in North Carolina,” see 21 N.C. Cent. L.J. 300 (1995).

For note, “State v. Alston: North Carolina Continues to Broaden its Mind to Admissibility of a Victim’s Out-of-Court Statements Under the Rule 803(3) Hearsay Exception in Criminal Cases,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1327 (1997).

For comment, “Corrosion of the Confrontation Clause in North Carolina:
A Comparison of State v. Brewington and State v. Ortiz-Zape with State v. Craven,” see 36 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 295 (2014).

Rule 404.
Character evidence not admissible to prove conduct; exceptions; other crimes.

Character evidence generally. — Evidence of a person’s character or a trait of his character is not admissible for the purpose of proving that he acted in conformity therewith on a particular occasion, except:

Character of accused. — Evidence of a pertinent trait of his character offered by an accused, or by the prosecution to rebut the same;

Character of victim. — Evidence of a pertinent trait of character of the victim of the crime offered by an accused, or by the prosecution to rebut the same, or evidence of a character trait of peacefulness of the victim offered by the prosecution in a homicide case to rebut evidence that the victim was the first aggressor;

Character of witness. — Evidence of the character of a witness, as provided in Rules 607, 608, and 609.

Other crimes, wrongs, or acts. — Evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts is not admissible to prove the character of a person in order to show that he acted in conformity therewith. It may, however, be admissible for other purposes, such as proof of motive, opportunity, intent, preparation, plan, knowledge, identity, or absence of mistake, entrapment or accident. Admissible evidence may include evidence of an offense committed by a juvenile if it would have been a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 7, s. 3; 1995, c. 509, s. 7.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. Evid. Rule 404, except for the addition of the word “entrapment” in the last sentence of subdivision (b).

Subdivision (a) deals with the basic question whether character evidence should be admitted. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Once the admissibility of character evidence in some form is established under this rule, reference must then be made to Rule 405, which follows, in order to determine the appropriate method of proof. If the character is that of a witness, see Rules 608 and 610 for methods of proof.

Character questions arise in two fundamentally different ways. (1) Character may itself be an element of a crime, claim, or defense. A situation of this kind is commonly referred to as ‘character in issue.’ Illustrations are: the chastity of the victim under a statute specifying her chastity as an element of the crime of seduction, or the competency of the driver in an action for negligently entrusting a motor vehicle to an incompetent driver. No problem of the general relevancy of character evidence is involved, and the present rule therefore has no provision on the subject. The only question relates to allowable methods of proof, as to which see Rule 405, immediately following. (2) Character evidence is susceptible of being used for the purpose of suggesting an inference that the person acted on the occasion in question consistently with his character. This use of character is often described as ‘circumstantial.’ Illustrations are: evidence of a violent disposition to prove that the person was the aggressor in an affray, or evidence of honesty in disproof of a charge of theft. This circumstantial use of character evidence raises questions of relevancy as well as questions of allowable methods of proof.”

The rule is consistent with North Carolina practice in that character evidence is generally not admissible as circumstantial evidence of conduct.

Subdivision (a)(1) creates an exception which permits an accused to introduce pertinent evidence of good character, in which event the prosecution may rebut with evidence of bad character. The exception is consistent with North Carolina practice except that subdivision (a)(1) speaks in terms of a “pertinent trait of his character”. This limits the exception to relevant character traits, whereas North Carolina practice permits use of evidence of general character. Professor Brandis states that:

“The North Carolina rule on this subject is unique, and appears to have had its origin in a misinterpretation of the earlier opinions.

In a majority of jurisdictions, character evidence must be confined to the particular trait of character involved in the conduct which is being investigated: In the case of a witness, his character for truth and veracity; of a defendant charged with a crime of violence, his peaceable or violent character; of an alleged embezzler, his honesty and integrity, etc.; a few courts will
also
admit evidence of general moral character, and this view was adopted by the North Carolina Court at an early date. For at least eighty years it was permissible to prove either the general character or the specific relevant trait of character of the person in question. When, during this period, the Court stated that only ‘general character’ could be shown, it meant that the only method of proving character was by general reputation, as distinguished from ‘particular facts and the opinion of witnesses.’ In

State v. Hairston

the principle of the earlier cases seems to have been misunderstood, and the rule was stated: ‘A party introducing a witness as to character can only prove the general character of the person asked about. The witness, of his own motion, may say in what respect it is good or bad.’ * * *

When the witness is asked whether he knows the general ‘reputation’ or ‘reputation and character’ of the subject, if he answers ‘No’ he should be stood aside; but if he answers ‘Yes’ it seems that he need not confine his testimony to that reputation, but may testify to reputation for some specific trait of character. This may be highly relevant, as when witness character is at stake and the answer deals with reputation for veracity. However, it may deal with reputation for liquor-selling, or horse trading, or domestic cruelty, even though the trait is wholly irrelevant to any issue in the case.

The Court recently reviewed the history of the rule, but did not change it. It explicitly held that it is proper for counsel to prepare his witness by explaining the rule and that this does not render the specific trait evidence inadmissible unless, at counsel’s suggestion, it is false. To this writer this is convincing proof that the rule should be scrapped. When counsel ascertains in advance a trait which the witness will specify, his question to elicit it should surely not merely be allowed, but be required to deal with that trait. In such case, objection may be made to the question and relevance rationally appraised. As it is, the question is foolproof and there is no opportunity to object until the specific trait evidence is actually given and the damage is done.”
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 114 (1982) (footnotes omitted):

Brandis also notes that:

“At best the present rule requires use of an ambiguous and misleading formula in examining character witnesses. At worst it has positively undesirable consequences. It opens the door to evidence of character traits which are irrelevant and prejudicial, and permits the prosecution, under the guise of impeaching the defendant as a witness, to prove traits having no relation to veracity but which are relevant on the issue of guilt, thus evading the rule (see § 104) prohibiting the State from attacking the defendant’s character unless he first puts it in issue. These consequences would be avoided, and logic and symmetry restored, by confining the inquiry to traits relevant for the particular purpose and holding the witness to responsive answers.”
Id.
at 114, n. 91.

Subdivision (a)(2) creates an exception to permit an accused to introduce pertinent evidence of character of the victim and to permit the prosecution to introduce similar evidence in rebuttal of the character evidence. The subdivision extends the exception recognized in North Carolina homicide and assault and battery cases to include all criminal cases. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 106 (1982).

North Carolina practice permits evidence of the character of the victim tending to show that the defendant had a reasonable apprehension of death or bodily harm.
Id.
Such evidence when introduced to show the reasonable apprehension of death or bodily harm to the accused, rather than to prove that the victim acted in conformity with his character trait on a particular occasion, would not be within the ban created by subdivision (a).

North Carolina practice also permits evidence of the character of the victim tending to show that the victim was the first aggressor. Unlike Rule 404, current North Carolina practice permits such evidence to be introduced only if the State’s evidence is wholly circumstantial or the nature of the transaction is in doubt.

Subdivision (a)(2) permits proof of any pertinent trait of the victim. North Carolina practice has confined the evidence to character for violence.
Id.

Subdivision (a)(2) is consistent with North Carolina practice in that evidence of the character of the victim for peace and quiet would be admissible to rebut evidence of the deceased’s character for violence and evidence of the victim’s good general character would not.
Id.
at 397.

The second part of subdivision (a)(2) permits introduction of “evidence of a character trait of peacefulness of the victim offered by the prosecution in a homicide case to rebut evidence that the victim was the first aggressor.” In North Carolina the prosecution may offer evidence of the deceased’s character for peace and quiet only if the defendant has introduced evidence of the deceased’s character for violence. See
Nance v. Fike,
244 N. C. 368, 372 (1956). Thus in North Carolina the accused can apparently claim self-defense without opening the door to character evidence relating to the victim. Subdivision (a)(2) would alter this practice and permit the prosecution to offer evidence of the peacefulness of the victim to rebut any evidence that the victim was the first aggressor.

The North Carolina exception, unlike the rule, applies to cases of civil assault and battery. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 106, at 393 (1982). The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“ The argument is made that circumstantial use of character ought to be allowed in civil cases to the same extent as in criminal cases, i.e., evidence of good (nonprejudicial) character would be admissible in the first instance, subject to rebuttal by evidence of bad character. * * * The difficulty with expanding the use of character evidence in civil cases is set forth by the California Law Revision Commission * * *:

‘Character evidence is of slight probative value and may be very prejudicial. It tends to distract the trier of fact from the main question of what actually happened on the particular occasion. It subtly permits the trier of fact to reward the good man and to punish the bad man because of their respective characters despite what the evidence in the case shows actually happened.’ ”

Subdivision (a)(3) creates an exception to the general rule and permits the introduction of evidence of the character of a witness, as provided in Rules 607, 608, and 609, to prove that he acted in conformity therewith on a particular occasion.

Subdivision (b) permits the introduction of specific “crimes, wrongs, or acts” for a purpose other than to prove the conduct of a person. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Subdivision (b) deals with a specialized but important application of the general rule excluding circumstantial use of character evidence. Consistently with that rule, evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts is not admissible to prove character as a basis for suggesting the inference that conduct on a particular occasion was in conformity with it. However, the evidence may be offered for another purpose, such as proof of motive, opportunity, and so on, which does not fall within the prohibition. In this situation the rule does not require that the evidence be excluded. No mechanical solution is offered. The determination must be made whether the danger of undue prejudice outweighs the probative value of the evidence, in view of the availability of other means of proof and other factors appropriate for making decisions of this kind under Rule 403.”

The list in the last sentence of subdivision (b) is nonexclusive and the fact that evidence cannot be brought within a category does not mean that the evidence is inadmissible.

Subdivision (b) is consistent with North Carolina practice.

Relevance of the complainant’s past behavior in a rape or sex offense case is governed by Rule 412.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Indelible Ink in the Milk: Adoption of the Inclusionary Approach to Uncharged Misconduct Evidence in State v. Coffey,” see 69 N.C.L. Rev. 1604 (1991).

For Survey of Developments in North Carolina Law (1992), see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1893 (1993).

For note, “The Admissibility of Prior Acquittal Evidence — Has North Carolina Adopted the ‘Minority View’? — The Effect of State v. Scott,” see 16 Campbell L. Rev. 231 (1994).

For article, “A Six Step Analysis of ‘Other Purposes’ Evidence Pursuant to Rule 404(b) of the North Carolina Rules of Evidence,” see 21 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1995).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For article, “What Went Wrong with FRE Rule 609:
A Look at How Jurors Really Misuse Prior Conviction Evidence,” see 23 N.C. Cent. L.J. 14 (1997).

For article, “Let’s Talk Specifics: Why STI Evidence Should Be Treated as a ‘Specific Instance’ Under Rape Shield Laws,” see 98 N.C.L. Rev. 689 (2020).

Rule 405.
Methods of proving character.

Reputation or opinion. — In all cases in which evidence of character or a trait of character of a person is admissible, proof may be made by testimony as to reputation or by testimony in the form of an opinion. On cross-examination, inquiry is allowable into relevant specific instances of conduct. Expert testimony on character or a trait of character is not admissible as circumstantial evidence of behavior.

Specific instances of conduct. — In cases in which character or a trait of character of a person is an essential element of a charge, claim, or defense, proof may also be made of specific instances of his conduct.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 405 except for the addition of the last sentence to subdivision (a).

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The rule deals only with allowable methods of proving character, not with admissibility of character evidence, which is covered by Rule 404.

Of the three methods of proving character provided by the rule, evidence of specific instances of conduct is the most convincing. At the same time it possesses the greatest capacity to arouse prejudice, to confuse, to surprise, and to consume time. Consequently the rule confines the use of evidence of this kind to cases in which character is, in the strict sense, in issue and hence deserving of a searching inquiry. When character is used circumstantially and hence occupies a lesser status in the case, proof may be only by reputation and opinion. These latter methods are also available when character is in issue.”

With respect to specific instances of conduct and reputation, this treatment is consistent with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 110 (1982).

With respect to opinion evidence, the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“In recognizing opinion as a means of proving character, the rule departs from usual contemporary practice in favor of that of an earlier day. See 7 Wigmore § 1986, pointing out that the earlier practice permitted opinion and arguing strongly for evidence based on personal knowledge and belief as contrasted with ‘the secondhand, irresponsible product of multiplied guesses and gossip which we term “reputation”.’ It seems likely that the persistence of reputation evidence is due to its largely being opinion in disguise. Traditionally character has been regarded primarily in moral overtones of good and bad: chaste, peaceable, truthful, honest. Nevertheless, on occasion nonmoral considerations crop up, as in the case of the incompetent driver, and this seems bound to happen increasingly. If character is defined as the kind of person one is, then account must be taken of varying ways of arriving at the estimate. * * * No effective dividing line exists between character and mental capacity, and the latter traditionally has been provable by opinion.”

In permitting opinion evidence as a means of proving character, the rule departs from current North Carolina practice. The general practice in this state is to frame questions in terms of reputation. However, if the witness is questioned concerning the “general character” or the “reputation and character” of another person, it is understood that the real subject of inquiry is reputation.
State v. King,

224 N.C. 329

(1944);

State v. Hicks,

200 N.C. 539

(1933);

State v. Cathey,

170 N.C. 794

(1916). Professor Brandis points out that:

“If as
e.g.,
in the initial question in

State v. Cathey

. . . ‘reputation’ is entirely omitted from the question, or if the question refers, as in

State v. Hicks

. . . to ‘reputation and character,’ the judge and counsel may know that the witness should confine himself to reputation, but, in the absence of further enlightenment, it seems most doubtful that the witness is so legally learned. Therefore, the practical result may well be to admit opinion evidence while giving lip service to the prohibition against it. Since, additionally, as a practical matter, many witnesses will in fact give opinion in answering a question ostensibly calling only for reputation, it seems to the author of this edition that it would be much more realistic for the Court to scrap the present stated rule and frankly admit either opinion or reputation testimony.”

Stansbury’s North Carolina Evidence

(Brandis ed.) § 110, at 338, n. 99.

Since Fed. R. Evid. 405 opens up the possibility of proving character by means of expert witnesses, the last sentence was added to subdivision (a) to prohibit expert testimony on character as it relates to the likelihood of whether or not the defendant committed the act he is accused of. This sentence is not intended to exclude expert testimony of a personality or character change as it relates to the issue of damages.

The second sentence of subdivision (a) permits inquiry on cross-examination into relevant specific instances of conduct. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“According to the great majority of cases, on cross-examination inquiry is allowable as to whether the reputation witness has heard of particular instances of conduct pertinent to the trait in question. * * * The theory is that, since the reputation witness relates what he has heard, the inquiry tends to shed light on the accuracy of his hearing and reporting. Accordingly, the opinion witness would be asked whether he knew, as well as whether he had heard. The fact is, of course, that these distinctions are of slight if any practical significance, and the second sentence of subdivision (a) eliminates them as a factor in formulating questions. This recognition of the propriety of inquiring into specific instances of conduct does not circumscribe inquiry otherwise into the bases of opinion and reputation testimony.”

Under current North Carolina practice, inquiry into specific instances of conduct on cross-examination is available only on the cross-examination of the person whose character is in question.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§§ 111, 115 (1982). It is not permissible in North Carolina to ask a character witness whether he has heard of the person in question having committed a particular act.

Id.

§ 115. However, to some extent the North Carolina rule may be circumvented by cross-examination as to specific traits.

Id.

Also, the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The express allowance of inquiry into specific instances of conduct on cross-examination in subdivision (a) and the express allowance of it as part of a case in chief when character is actually in issue in subdivision (b) contemplate that testimony of specific instances is not generally permissible on the direct examination of an ordinary opinion witness to character. Similarly as to witnesses to the character of witnesses under Rule 608(b). Opinion testimony on direct in these situations ought in general to correspond to reputation testimony as now given,
i.e.,
be confined to the nature and extent of observation and acquaintance upon which the opinion is based. See Rule 701.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For article, “The Emotional Woman,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 1027 (2021).